Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-1221
Hearing officer;
powers and duties.

Upon the receipt of a petition
pursuant to section 83-1219, the department shall assign it to a hearing officer.
The hearing officer shall receive all subsequent pleadings and shall conduct
the hearing. At the hearing the parties shall present evidence on the issues
raised in the pleadings. At the completion of the proceedings, the hearing
officer shall prepare a report based on the evidence presented containing recommendations for the director to make findings
of fact and conclusions of law. Within forty-five days after the receipt of
a request for a hearing, the director shall
prepare a final decision and order directing such action as may be necessary.
At the request of either party for good cause shown, the hearing officer may
grant specific extensions of time beyond this period. The report and the final
decision and order shall be delivered to each party or attorney of record
by certified mail.

Laws 1991, LB 830, § 21;

Laws 2010, LB849, § 32.